Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.211, subdivision 1c, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to any nurse completing postgraduate practice requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 148.211, subdivision 1c, and any applications for licensure submitted on or after that date. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01579 148.211 LICENSING. Subd. 1c. Postgraduate practice. A nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist who qualifies for licensure as an advanced practice registered nurse must practice for at least 2,080 hours, within the context of a collaborative agreement, within a hospital or integrated clinical setting where advanced practice registered nurses and physicians work together to provide patient care. The nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist shall submit written evidence to the board with the application, or upon completion of the required collaborative practice experience. For purposes of this subdivision, a collaborative agreement is a mutually agreed upon plan for the overall working relationship between a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist, and one or more physicians licensed under chapter 147 or in another state or United States territory, or one or more advanced practice registered nurses licensed under this section that designates the scope of collaboration necessary to manage the care of patients. The nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist, and one of the collaborating physicians or advanced practice registered nurses, must have experience in providing care to patients with the same or similar medical problems.